Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-3,116.01
Shareholders information; director; disapproval; effect.

The documents required to be filed with the Director of Insurance by sections 44-3,116 and 44-3,117 shall not be used, issued, published or circulated before a period of ten days following the date of such filing, or any such shorter period as may be authorized by the director, has elapsed. Within such ten-day or shorter period, the director may disapprove of any document filed with him, stating his reasons therefor in writing, in which case such documents shall not be used, issued, published, or circulated.

Laws 1969, c. 369, § 3, p. 1311.